fst/norm.twolc
! Orthographic variation — twolc rules for the "lenient" stage.
! Allows common surface variants to be recognized by the canonical FST.

Alphabet
 a à ā b c d ḑ e è ē f g ģ h i ì ī j k ķ l m n ņ o ò ō p r ŗ s š t ţ u ù ū w z ž
 ;
Rules

! After a long/gravis vowel, a geminate consonant may surface as single.

"nn → n after long vowel"
  n:0 <=> ā _ n ; ē _ n ; ī _ n ; ō _ n ; ū _ n ;

"mm → m after long vowel"
  m:0 <=> ā _ m ; ē _ m ; ī _ m ; ō _ m ; ū _ m ;

"kk → k after long vowel"
  k:0 <=> ā _ k ; ē _ k ; ī _ k ; ō _ k ; ū _ k ;

"pp → p after long vowel"
  p:0 <=> ā _ p ; ē _ p ; ī _ p ; ō _ p ; ū _ p ;

"tt → t after long vowel"
  t:0 <=> ā _ t ; ē _ t ; ī _ t ; ō _ t ; ū _ t ;

"rr → r after long vowel"
  r:0 <=> ā _ r ; ē _ r ; ī _ r ; ō _ r ; ū _ r ;

! Same degemination after SHORT vowels — allows corpus geminates to
! match canonical single-consonant forms (P32 nouns like snaps, lads).

"nn → n after short vowel"
  n:0 <=> a _ n ; e _ n ; i _ n ; o _ n ; u _ n ;

"mm → m after short vowel"
  m:0 <=> a _ m ; e _ m ; i _ m ; o _ m ; u _ m ;

"kk → k after short vowel"
  k:0 <=> a _ k ; e _ k ; i _ k ; o _ k ; u _ k ;

"pp → p after short vowel"
  p:0 <=> a _ p ; e _ p ; i _ p ; o _ p ; u _ p ;

"tt → t after short vowel"
  t:0 <=> a _ t ; e _ t ; i _ t ; o _ t ; u _ t ;

"rr → r after short vowel"
  r:0 <=> a _ r ; e _ r ; i _ r ; o _ r ; u _ r ;

"dd → d after short vowel"
  d:0 <=> a _ d ; e _ d ; i _ d ; o _ d ; u _ d ;

"ll → l after short vowel"
  l:0 <=> a _ l ; e _ l ; i _ l ; o _ l ; u _ l ;
